Vermont, session 2025-2026, S293.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. BROWNFIELDS; UPPER VALLEY REGIONAL LANDFILL
The sum of $143,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Natural Resources in fiscal year 2027 for the purpose of a grant to
the Green Mountain Economic Development Corporation (GMEDC) for the
costs of reinitiating brownfields site development of the Upper Valley
Regional Landfill in the village of Post Mills in the Town of Thetford. The
VT LEG #385984 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.293
2026 Page 2 of 2
grant shall be available to GMEDC for costs incurred in a probate proceeding
to obtain appointment as court-appointed administrator to facilitate the transfer
of the site to new ownership for approval to redevelop the landfill site.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385984 v.1